04_Morphology/uzb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Morpheme boundary
%<nom%>              ! nominative
%<gen%>              ! genitive
%<dat%>              ! dative
%<def_acc%>          ! definite accusative
%<loc%>              ! locative
%<abl%>              ! ablative

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;
%<n%>: PLURAL ;
%<n%>: POSSESSIVE ;
%<n%>: DERIVATION ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>lar CASE ;
%<pl%>:%>lar POSSESSIVE ;

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: # ; ! ""
%<gen%>:%>ning #; ! "of"
%<dat%>:%>ga # ; ! "to"
%<def_acc%>:%>ni #; ! "the (obj)"
%<loc%>:%>da # ; ! "at"
%<abl%>:%>dan # ; ! "from"
# ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVE

%<poss_1s%>:%>im CASE ; ! "my"
%<poss_1p%>:%>imiz CASE ; ! "our"
%<poss_2s%>:%>ing CASE ; ! "your"
%<poss_2p%>:%>ingiz CASE ; ! "your (pl.)"
%<poss_3s%>:%>i CASE ; ! "his/her/its"
%<poss_3p%>:%>i CASE ; ! "their"

LEXICON DERIVATION

%<dim%>:%>loq CASE; ! "little"
%<dim%>:%>loq PLURAL; ! "little"
%<prof%>:%>chi CASE; ! "profession, -ist"
%<prof%>:%>chi PLURAL; ! "profession, -ist"


LEXICON Nouns

konfet:konfet N ; ! "sweets, candy"
gilam:gilam N ; ! "carpet, rug"
lazzat:lazzat N ; ! "pleasure"
kino:kino N ; ! "cinema, film"
ishq:ishq N ; ! "love"
odam:odam N ; ! "person, man"
qiz:qiz N ; ! "girl, daughter"
pul:pul N ; ! "money"
qalam:qalam N ; ! "pen"
raqs:raqs N ; ! "dance"
safar:safar N ; ! "travel"
savdo:savdo N ; ! "trade, commerce"
tarjima:tarjima N ; ! "translation"
tush:tush N ; ! "dream"
un:un N ; ! "flour"
va'z:va'z N ; ! "sermon"
xat:xat N ; ! "letter, written message"
yashik:yashik N ; ! "box, crate"
tog':tog' N ; ! "mountain"
sham:sham N ; ! "candle"
